src/fst/morphology/affixes/regular_declinations.lexc
! inflectional types and analogue rules for nouns, adjectives and other declinables
! VVS stands for types from Ü. Viks "Väike vormisõnastik" for reference purposes

!---------------
! inflectional types
!---------------

!---------------
! not-so-exceptional inflectional types
!---------------

LEXICON AASTA    ! VVS 1 (productive) for vowel-final; stress on penultimate syllable words

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! aasta
              : 2C ;    ! aasta etc
              : US_DERIVATION ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON REDEL    ! VVS 2 (productive) for consonant-ending, stress on penultimate syllable words
   
              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! redel
              :%>i 2C ;    ! redeli etc
              : US_DERIVATION ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;
   +Usage/Rare:%>i LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON TOOBER    ! VVS 2 (productive) for consonant-ending, stress on penultimate syllable words
   
              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! koppel
              :%{no.e%}%>i 2C ;    ! kopli etc
              : US_DERIVATION ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;
   +Usage/Rare:%{no.e%}%>i LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON PIKSEL    ! VVS 2 (productive) for consonant-ending, stress on penultimate syllable words
   
              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! piksel
              :%{no.e%}%>i 2C ;    ! piksli etc
   +Usage/Rare:%>i 2C ;    ! pikseli etc
              : US_DERIVATION ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;
   +Usage/Rare:%{no.e%}%>i LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON GOSPEL    ! VVS 2 (productive) for consonant-ending, stress on penultimate syllable words
   
              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! gospel
   +Usage/Rare:%{no.e%}%>i 2C ;    ! gospli etc
              :%>i 2C ;    ! gospeli etc
              : US_DERIVATION ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;
   +Usage/Rare:%{no.e%}%>i LIK_DERIVATION ;


LEXICON VIRSIK    ! VVS 2 (productive) for -ik, -ing; stress on penultimate syllable words

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! virsik
              :%>u 2C ;    ! virsiku etc
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;
   +Usage/Rare:%>u LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON LOHAKAS    ! VVS 2 (productive) -kas, -jas etc ending words (incl derivations)

              :s SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! lohakas
              : 2C ;    ! lohaka etc
              : US_DERIVATION ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;   ! kaabakalik ???

LEXICON TUNTUD    ! VVS 2 (productive) -d ending words (incl derivations); only adjectives

              :d SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! tuntud
              : 2C ;    ! tuntu etc
              : US_DERIVATION ;
 
LEXICON MAGUS    ! VVS 2 (productive) for -v, -tav derivations (adjectives)
                 ! + (unproductive) i.e. unstable (closed) type

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! magus
              :%>A1 2C ;    ! magusa; A1 is necessary for pingne - pingsa
              :%>A1 US_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON HALE    ! VVS 2 (unproductive) i.e. unstable (closed) type

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! hale, sajas
              :da 2C ;    ! haleda, sajanda
              :da US_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON HOOLAS    ! VVS 3 (unproductive) i.e. unstable (closed) type; strengthening gradation

              :%{W%} SG_NOMINATIVE ;        ! hoolas
              :%>a 2C ;                    ! hoolsa etc
   +Usage/Rare:%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;      ! hoolast
+Usage/NotNorm:%{W%} TE_PL ;  ! hoolaste etc 
              :%>a US_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON HAARE    ! VVS 4, VVS 5 (unproductive) i.e. unstable (closed) type

              :%{W%} SG_NOMINATIVE ;              ! haare
              :%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;            ! haaret
              :me 2C_STRONG ;          ! haarme, habeme etc, haarmeid, haarmeil etc
              :me TE_PL ;        ! asemete, haarmete
              :me LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON PINGE    ! VVS 6 (productive) i.e. stable 
                 ! (open to verbal derivations, e.g. kiune from kiunuma)
                 ! + (unproductive) i.e. unstable (closed) type; 

              :%{W%} SG_NOMINATIVE ;      ! pinge
              :%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! pinget
              :%{W%} TE_PL ;              ! pingete etc
              : 2C_STRONG ;               ! pinge etc, pingeid, pingeil etc
              : US_DERIVATION ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON KOTKAS    !  VVS 7 (unproductive) i.e. unstable (closed) type; 

              :s%{W%} SG_NOMINATIVE ;      ! kotkas
              :s%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! kotkast
              :s%{W%} TE_PL ;              ! kotkaste
              : 2C_STRONG ;               ! kotka etc, kotkaid, kotkail etc
+Usage/NotNorm: TE_PL ;                 ! kotkate etc
              : US_DERIVATION ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON PIPAR    !  VVS 8 (unproductive) i.e. unstable (closed) type; = HOOLAS

              :%{W%} SG_NOMINATIVE ;      ! pipar
              :%{W%}%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;    ! pipart
              :%{W%} TE_PL ;              ! piparde etc
              :%>a 2C_STRONG ;
+Usage/NotNorm:%>a TE_PL ;       ! piprate etc 
              :%>a LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON SOOLANE    ! VVS 9 (productive) simplex words ending with -s (katus), VVS 10 affix -ne; 
                       
              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
              : NE_S_COMMON ;
              :E1%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;            ! soolasesse, katusesse
              :E1%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! soolaseid, katuseid
   +Usage/Rare:E1%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! soolaseil, katuseil etc
              :E1»i IM_DERIVATION ;            ! soolaseim

LEXICON OLULINE    ! VVS 11, 12 (productive)
                   ! VVS 12: affixes -lane, -line, -mine, -tine, -ke(ne), -stikune (?)
                   ! VVS 11: derived words ending with -us, -is (?) (harjutus)
                  
              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
              : NE_S_COMMON ;
              : LINE_US_SPECIFIC ;
              :E1 LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON KATKINE    ! VVS 9 & (11), 10 & (12) (productive)
                   ! VVS 10 & (12): affix -ne, but sg ill, pl part and vocal cases also like -line
                   ! VVS  9 & (11): simplex -s, but also like -us (gloobus) 
                 
              : SOOLANE ;
   +Usage/Rare: LINE_US_NORM ;              ! like OLULINE: katkisse, katkisi
   +Usage/Rare:%>I1 N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! like OLULINE: katkisil etc; (ever used?)
              :E1 LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON SUULINE    ! VVS (9) & 11, (10) & 12 (productive)
                   ! VVS (10) & 12: affix -line, but pl part and vowel cases also like -ne
                   ! VVS  (9) & 11: derived -us, but pl part and vowel cases (?) also like simplex -s (vaatlus) 

              : OLULINE ;
   +Usage/Rare:E1%>id PL_PARTITIVE ;            ! like SOOLANE: suuliseid, vaatluseid
   +Usage/Rare:E1%>i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;    ! like SOOLANE: suuliseil, vaatluseil etc
   +Usage/Rare:E1»i IM_DERIVATION ;            ! like SOOLANE: suuliseim
              :E1 LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON PEENIKE    ! VVS 12 (productive): affix -ke; almost = OLULINE, except sg nom

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
   +Usage/Rare:ne SG_NOMINATIVE ;
              :ne NE_S_COMMON ;
              :ne LINE_US_SPECIFIC ;
              :E1 LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON PERE    ! VVS 16 (productive)

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
              : N_SG_SUBPARA ;          ! pere, baika etc
              :%>t SG_PARTITIVE ;        ! peret, baikat
              :%{S%} SG_ILL_VARIANT ;     ! perre
              : SG_ILL_VARIANT ;         ! peresse, baikasse 
              : DE_PL ;
              :%>sid PL_PARTITIVE ;   
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON KAVA    ! VVS 17, 18 (productive) + (unproductive)
                ! VVS 17 (productive)
                ! VVS 18 (unproductive): words with quality gradation

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
              :%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;     ! kava, sõja etc
              : SG_PARTITIVE ;           ! kava
              :%{S%} SG_ILL_VARIANT ;     ! kavva
              :%{W%} SG_ILL_VARIANT ;    ! kavasse 
              : DE_PL ;
              :%>%{s%}%{i%}%{d%} PL_PAR_VARIANT ;   ! kingi, kingasid+Usage/Rare vs. puudi+Usage/Rare,
                                                    ! puudasid; kavu, kavasid; sõdu, sõdasid
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON MUUSEUM    ! VVS 2 & 19 (productive)
                   ! forms may be based on 2 productive, i.e. stable types (aktiivne muuttüüp)
                   ! if prononunced as 2-syllable word (muus-jum), then like REDEL
                   ! if prononunced as 3-syllable word (muus-e-um), then like TAUD 

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
              :%>i%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ; 
              :%>i SG_PARTITIVE ;             ! muuseumi
   +Usage/Rare:%>i SG_ILLATIVE ;              ! muuseumi  ! in TAUD, this is the default ill
              :%>i%{W%}%>sse SG_ILLATIVE ;    ! muuseumisse ! in TAUD, this is the rare ill
              :%>i DE_PL ;                    ! muuseumide etc 
              :%>e PL_PARTITIVE ;             ! muuseume
   +Usage/Rare:%>i 2C_ADDED_TO_1C ;   ! REDEL
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON PIIM    ! VVS 22; (unproductive) i.e. unstable type (passiivne muuttüüp) sepp, kaup, ...

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
              :%{sg.a%} 1C ;
              :%>a US_DERIVATION ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;          ! NB! not checked on real usage
              :%>a%{W%} LIK_DERIVATION ;         ! NB! not checked on real usage

LEXICON KOON    ! VVS 22; (unproductive) i.e. unstable type (passiivne muuttüüp) lõpp, laug

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
              :%{sg.u%} 1C ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;          ! NB! not checked on real usage
              :%>u%{W%} LIK_DERIVATION ;         ! NB! not checked on real usage

LEXICON EIT    ! VVS 22; (unproductive) i.e. unstable type (passiivne muuttüüp) kuusk, kärg

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
              :%{sg.e%} 1C ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;          ! NB! not checked on real usage
              :%>e%{W%} LIK_DERIVATION ;         ! NB! not checked on real usage

LEXICON TAUD    ! VVS 22; (productive) i.e. stable type (aktiivne muuttüüp) siil, president, ...

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
              :%>%{pl.e%}%{sg.i%} 1C ;    ! {pl.e} is here so it need not be in the stem lexicon
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;          ! NB! not checked on real usage
              :%>i%{W%} LIK_DERIVATION ;         ! NB! not checked on real usage

LEXICON FIAT    ! VVS 22; (productive) i.e. stable type (aktiivne muuttüüp) 
                ! almost == TAUD, but final stop does not change in weak grade (note {F} in front of {W})

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;
              :%>%{pl.e%}%{sg.i%}%{F%} 1C ;    ! {pl.e} is here so it need not be in the stem lexicon
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;          ! ?? lowercasing also ??
              :%>i%{F%}{W%} LIK_DERIVATION ;          ! ?? lowercasing also ??

LEXICON KABINET    ! VVS 22; (productive) i.e. stable type (aktiivne muuttüüp) 
                   ! almost == TAUD, but Sg Nom orthography with single final stop instead of 2

              : SG_NOMINATIVE ;    ! kabinet
                                          ! sg nom has a single final stop instead of double, 
                                          ! so it has to be doubled to get the forms right
              :%{dbl%}%>%{pl.e%}%{sg.i%} 1C ;
              : LIK_DERIVATION ;          ! NB! not checked on real usage
              :%>i%{W%} LIK_DERIVATION ;         ! NB! not checked on real usage

! VVS 24 is lexical variants under VVS 22 various subtypes
